New Jersey, session 222, S4240.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The Secretary of State, in coordination with the Commissioner of the Department of Corrections, shall provide to qualified voters who are detained or incarcerated for reasons other than a conviction for an indictable offense an application for a mail-in ballot. The application shall enable the voter to request to vote by mail-in ballot and to provide the address where the voter is detained or incarcerated as a secondary address to which the ballot shall be sent in accordance with section 3 of P.L.2009, c.79 (C.19:63-3). b.    Except as otherwise provided by this section, an application for a mail-in ballot submitted pursuant to subsection a. of this section shall be treated as any other application submitted pursuant to P.L.2009, c.79 (C.19:63-1 et seq.), and the voter submitting the application shall receive and return their mail-in ballot as provided by P.L.2009, c.79 (C.19:63-1 et seq.). c.     If a voter who requests to vote by mail-in ballot pursuant to subsection a. of this section is subsequently transferred to another location, then the Department of Corrections shall ensure the delivery of the mail-in ballot to the voter; provided, however, that such act shall not result in the department or any employee thereof being considered a messenger or bearer within the meaning of P.L.2009, c.79 (C.19:63-1 et seq.). d.    Nothing in this section shall be construed to confer the right to vote to persons incarcerated as the result of a conviction for an indictable offense or otherwise disqualified from voting in this State.  If a person is convicted of an indictable offense after having completed an application for a mail-in ballot pursuant to subsection a. of this section, any ballot sent to or received from the person shall be deemed void and shall not be counted. 2.    This act shall take effect January 1 next following the date of enactment.